Illinois, session 104th, HB4900.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-5)7    Sec. 110-5. Determining the amount of bail and conditions 8of release. 9    (a) In determining which conditions of pretrial release, 10if any, will reasonably ensure the appearance of a defendant 11as required or the safety of any other person or the community 12and the likelihood of compliance by the defendant with all the 13conditions of pretrial release, the court shall, on the basis 14of available information, take into account such matters as:15        (1) the nature and circumstances of the offense 16    charged;17        (2) the weight of the evidence against the defendant, 18    except that the court may consider the admissibility of 19    any evidence sought to be excluded;20        (3) the history and characteristics of the defendant, 21    including:22            (A) the defendant's character, physical and mental 23        condition, family ties, employment, financial   HB4900- 2 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1        resources, length of residence in the community, 2        community ties, past relating to drug or alcohol 3        abuse, conduct, history criminal history, and record 4        concerning appearance at court proceedings; and5            (B) whether, at the time of the current offense or 6        arrest, the defendant was on probation, parole, or on 7        other release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or 8        completion of sentence for an offense under federal 9        law, or the law of this or any other state;10        (4) the nature and seriousness of the real and present 11    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 12    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 13    case, that would be posed by the defendant's release, if 14    applicable, as required under paragraph (7.5) of Section 4 15    of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act;16        (5) the nature and seriousness of the risk of 17    obstructing or attempting to obstruct the criminal justice 18    process that would be posed by the defendant's release, if 19    applicable;20        (6) when a person is charged with a violation of a 21    protective order, domestic battery, aggravated domestic 22    battery, kidnapping, aggravated kidnaping, unlawful 23    restraint, aggravated unlawful restraint, cyberstalking, 24    harassment by telephone, harassment through electronic 25    communications, or an attempt to commit first degree 26    murder committed against a spouse or a current or former   HB4900- 3 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1    partner in a cohabitation or dating relationship, 2    regardless of whether an order of protection has been 3    issued against the person, the court may consider the 4    following additional factors:5            (A) whether the alleged incident involved 6        harassment or abuse, as defined in the Illinois 7        Domestic Violence Act of 1986;8            (B) whether the person has a history of domestic 9        violence, as defined in the Illinois Domestic Violence 10        Act of 1986, or a history of other criminal acts;11            (C) the mental health of the person;12            (D) whether the person has a history of violating 13        the orders of any court or governmental entity;14            (E) whether the person has been, or is, 15        potentially a threat to any other person;16            (F) whether the person has access to deadly 17        weapons or a history of using deadly weapons;18            (G) whether the person has a history of abusing 19        alcohol or any controlled substance;20            (H) the severity of the alleged incident that is 21        the basis of the alleged offense, including, but not 22        limited to, the duration of the current incident, and 23        whether the alleged incident involved the use of a 24        weapon, physical injury, sexual assault, 25        strangulation, abuse during the alleged victim's 26        pregnancy, abuse of pets, or forcible entry to gain   HB4900- 4 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1        access to the alleged victim;2            (I) whether a separation of the person from the 3        victim of abuse or a termination of the relationship 4        between the person and the victim of abuse has 5        recently occurred or is pending;6            (J) whether the person has exhibited obsessive or 7        controlling behaviors toward the victim of abuse, 8        including, but not limited to, stalking, surveillance, 9        or isolation of the victim of abuse or the victim's 10        family member or members;11            (K) whether the person has expressed suicidal or 12        homicidal ideations; and13            (L) any other factors deemed by the court to have a 14        reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 15        reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive 16        behavior, or lack of that behavior.17        (7) in cases of stalking or aggravated stalking under 18    Section 12-7.3 or 12-7.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the 19    court may consider the factors listed in paragraph (6) and 20    the following additional factors:21            (A) any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 22        history indicative of violent, abusive or assaultive 23        behavior, or lack of that behavior; the evidence may 24        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 25        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 26        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings;  HB4900- 5 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1            (B) any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 2        psychiatric, or other similar social history that 3        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 4        nature, or lack of any such history;5            (C) the nature of the threat that is the basis of 6        the charge against the defendant;7            (D) any statements made by, or attributed to, the 8        defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 9        them;10            (E) the age and physical condition of any person 11        allegedly assaulted by the defendant;12            (F) whether the defendant is known to possess or 13        have access to any weapon or weapons; and14            (G) any other factors deemed by the court to have a 15        reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 16        reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive 17        behavior, or lack of that behavior. 18    (b) The court may use a regularly validated risk 19assessment tool to aid its determination of appropriate 20conditions of release as provided under Section 110-6.4. If a 21risk assessment tool is used, the defendant's counsel shall be 22provided with the information and scoring system of the risk 23assessment tool used to arrive at the determination. The 24defendant retains the right to challenge the validity of a 25risk assessment tool used by the court and to present evidence 26relevant to the defendant's challenge.   HB4900- 6 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1    (c) The court shall impose any conditions that are 2mandatory under subsection (a) of Section 110-10. The court 3may impose any conditions that are permissible under 4subsection (b) of Section 110-10. The conditions of release 5imposed shall be the least restrictive conditions or 6combination of conditions necessary to reasonably ensure the 7appearance of the defendant as required or the safety of any 8other person or persons or the community. When determining 9which conditions reasonably ensure the appearance of the 10defendant as required or the safety of any other person or 11persons of the community, the court shall consider the ability 12of the court or pretrial services to effectively monitor the 13defendant's compliance with the conditions of pretrial release 14that are imposed. 15    (d) When a person is charged with a violation of a 16protective order, the court may order the defendant placed 17under electronic surveillance as a condition of pretrial 18release, as provided in Section 5-8A-7 of the Unified Code of 19Corrections, based on the information collected under 20paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Section, the results 21of any assessment conducted, or other circumstances of the 22violation.23    (e) If a person remains in pretrial detention 48 hours 24after having been ordered released with pretrial conditions, 25the court shall hold a hearing to determine the reason for 26continued detention. If the reason for continued detention is   HB4900- 7 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1due to the unavailability or the defendant's ineligibility for 2one or more pretrial conditions previously ordered by the 3court or directed by a pretrial services agency, the court 4shall reopen the conditions of release hearing to determine 5what available pretrial conditions exist that will reasonably 6ensure the appearance of a defendant as required, the safety 7of any other person, and the likelihood of compliance by the 8defendant with all the conditions of pretrial release. The 9inability of the defendant to pay for a condition of release or 10any other ineligibility for a condition of pretrial release 11shall not be used as a justification for the pretrial 12detention of that defendant.13    (f) Prior to the defendant's first appearance, and with 14sufficient time for meaningful attorney-client contact to 15gather information in order to advocate effectively for the 16defendant's pretrial release, the court shall appoint the 17public defender or a licensed attorney at law of this State to 18represent the defendant for purposes of that hearing, unless 19the defendant has obtained licensed counsel. Defense counsel 20shall have access to the same documentary information relied 21upon by the prosecution and presented to the court. 22    (f-5) Upon verified application by the defendant, the 23court before which the proceeding is pending may reconsider 24the current pretrial conditions imposed and determine whether 25the current conditions imposed are necessary to reasonably 26ensure the appearance of the defendant as required, the safety   HB4900- 8 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1of any other person, and the compliance of the defendant with 2all the conditions of pretrial release. The defendant shall be 3required to present a verified application setting forth in 4detail any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 5previous hearing determining conditions of pre-trial release. 6If the court removes a pretrial release condition, the court 7shall state on the record of the proceedings the findings of 8facts and conclusions of law upon which such order is based. At 9each subsequent appearance of the defendant before the court, 10the judge must find that the current conditions imposed are 11necessary to reasonably ensure the appearance of the defendant 12as required, the safety of any other person, and the 13compliance of the defendant with all the conditions of 14pretrial release. The court is not required to be presented 15with new information or a change in circumstance to remove 16pretrial conditions. 17    (g) Electronic monitoring, GPS monitoring, or home 18confinement can only be imposed as a condition of pretrial 19release if a no less restrictive condition of release or 20combination of less restrictive condition of release would 21reasonably ensure the appearance of the defendant for later 22hearings or protect an identifiable person or persons from 23imminent threat of serious physical harm.24    (h) If the court imposes electronic monitoring, GPS 25monitoring, or home confinement, the court shall set forth in 26the record the basis for its finding. A defendant shall be   HB4900- 9 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b1given custodial credit for each day he or she was subjected to 2home confinement, at the same rate described in subsection (b) 3of Section 5-4.5-100 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 4court may give custodial credit to a defendant for each day the 5defendant was subjected to GPS monitoring without home 6confinement or electronic monitoring without home confinement. 7    (i) If electronic monitoring, GPS monitoring, or home 8confinement is imposed, the court shall determine every 60 9days if no less restrictive condition of release or 10combination of less restrictive conditions of release would 11reasonably ensure the appearance, or continued appearance, of 12the defendant for later hearings or protect an identifiable 13person or persons from imminent threat of serious physical 14harm. If the court finds that there are less restrictive 15conditions of release, the court shall order that the 16condition be removed. This subsection takes effect January 1, 172022.18    (j) Crime Victims shall be given notice by the State's 19Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph (1) 20of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 21and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity 22at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 23    (k) The State and defendants may appeal court orders 24imposing conditions of pretrial release. 25(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 26102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1104, eff.   HB4900- 10 -LRB104 17012 RLC 30427 b11-1-23.)